tests/variable forms - normal and added n.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
      App: hfst-optimised-lookup
      Gen: ../khk.autogen.hfst
      Morph: ../khk.automorf.hfst

Tests:

 "үнэ = price":
    үнэ<n><nom> : үнэ
    үнэ<n><acc> : үнийг
    үнэ<n><gen> : үнийн
    үнэ<n><abl> : үнээс
    үнэ<n><abl> : үнэнээс
    үнэ<n><dat> : үнэд
    үнэ<n><dat> : үнэнд
    үнэ<n><pl><nom> : үнүүд
    үнэ<n><pl><nom> : үнэнүүд

 "хот = herd animal pen":
    хот<n><nom> : хот
    хот<n><acc> : хотыг
    хот<n><gen> : хотны
    хот<n><abl> : хотноос
    хот<n><dat> : хотонд
    хот<n><pl><nom> : ?хотууд
    хот<n><pl><nom> : (хотнууд

 "хэл = tongue/language":
    хэл<n><nom> : хэл
    хэл<n><acc> : хэлийг
    хэл<n><gen> : хэлний
    хэл<n><abl> : хэлнээс
    хэл<n><dat> : хэлэнд
    хэл<n><pl><nom> : хэлүүд
    хэл<n><pl><nom> : хэлнүүд

 "юм = thing":
    юм<n><nom> : юм
    юм<n><acc> : юмыг
    юм<n><gen> : юмны
    юм<n><abl> : юмнаас
    юм<n><dat> : юманд
    юм<n><pl><nom> : юмс
    юм<n><pl><nom> : юмнууд

 "өнгө = colour":
    өнгө<n><nom> : өнгө
    өнгө<n><acc> : өнгийг
    өнгө<n><gen> : (өнгийн
    өнгө<n><gen> : өнгөний
    өнгө<n><abl> : (өнгөөс
    өнгө<n><abl> : өнгөнөөс
    өнгө<n><dat> : өнгөнд
    өнгө<n><pl><nom> : өнгөнүүд
